Wyoming, session 2026, HB0095.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-8-105(b) by creating a new
paragraph (iv), by renumbering (iv) as (v) and (f)(intro)
is amended to read:

6-8-105. Exceptions for state issued concealed carry
permits; penalty.
HB0095

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0038

(b) Persons lawfully carrying concealed weapons in
Wyoming under W.S. 6-8-104(a)(ii) through (iv) may carry a
concealed weapon in the following places:

(iv) Any public college or university facility,
except for any public college or university athletic event
where alcoholic beverages are being sold;

(iv)(v) Any public building not otherwise
prohibited under W.S. 6-8-104(t) or regulated under this
section.

(f) The board of trustees in each school district may
adopt rules and regulations to govern employees and
volunteers lawfully carrying concealed weapons in Wyoming
under W.S. 6-8-104 on or in any property or facility owned
or leased by the school district. If no rules and
regulations are adopted under this subsection, an employee
or a volunteer with a permit to conceal carry under W.S.
6-8-104(a)(ii) may carry a concealed weapon under W.S.
6-8-105(c)(ii) or (iii) paragraph (b)(iv) or (c)(ii) of
this section onto school property. Any rules and
HB0095

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0038
regulations adopted under this subsection shall only apply
to persons who are volunteers or employees, as defined by
subsection (g) of this section. The rules under this
subsection shall:

Section 2. W.S. 6-8-105(c)(iii) is repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0095